District of Columbia statutes.
2-1395

Functions of the Commission.

The Commission shall:

(a)

Serve as an advocate for African persons in the District;

(b)

Review and submit to the Mayor, the Council, and the Office, and make available to the public, an annual report that includes an analysis of the needs of the African communities in the District;

(c)

Cooperate with federal, state and private agencies concerned with activities pertaining to the African communities;

(d)

Conduct or participate in public hearings and other forums to determine views of the African communities and other members of the public on matters affecting health, safety and welfare of those communities;

(e)

Bring to the attention of the Mayor and the Office cases of neglect, abuse and incidents of bias against members of the African communities in the administration of District and federal laws;

(f)

Review and comment on proposed District and federal legislation, regulations, policies, and programs and make policy recommendations on issues affecting the health, safety, and welfare of the African communities;

(g)

Develop policy and provide continuing review of the planning undertaken by the Office; and

(h)

Make reasonable requests for information necessary to aid the Commission in the discharge of its responsibilities.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-111, § 6, 53 DCR 2532
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 6a of Office and Commission on African Affairs Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-215, March 6, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2762).
Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-215 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 6a. Transition provisions.
“(a) The Mayor’s Advisory Commission on African Community Affairs, established pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2003-114, dated August 11, 2003, shall be abolished as of the earlier of the following dates:
“(1) The date that a majority of the 15 public members of the Commission on African Affairs are sworn in; or
“(2) December 31, 2006.
“(b) All records of the Mayor’s Advisory Commission on African Community Affairs, established pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2003-114, dated August 11, 2003, shall be transferred to the Commission on African Affairs, as of the date established in subsection (a) of this section.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-215 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Office and Commission on African Affairs Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-501, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 9051).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Office and Commission on African Affairs Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-5, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1448).